Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2203
Underground cables and equipment; map required.

Municipalities may by ordinance require the filing with the city or village clerk by the person, firm, or corporation constructing, installing, operating, or maintaining such community antenna television service of a proper map showing the exact location of all underground cables and equipment, together with a statement showing the exact nature of the same.

Laws 1959, c. 68, § 3, p. 294;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2803;

Laws 1969, c. 119, § 3, p. 537.